apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
<sdef n="vbdo"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="want__vbmod">
      <e c="CP: regular verbs (-,s,ing,ed)">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="will/__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ould</l>
          <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l>
          <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    <!--  <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> --><!--l'auxiliar té participi??? -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="d/o__vaux">
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oes</l>
          <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="have to"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="want to"><i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="will"><i>will</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="would"><i>would</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="can"><i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="be able to" r="RL" c="de moment només es genera"><i></i><par n="/be_able_to__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="do"><i>d</i><par n="d/o__vaux"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
